Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201760-6,101
Accidents; coroner; report to Department of Transportation.

Any coroner or other official performing the duties of coroner shall report in writing to the Department of Transportation the death of any person within his or her jurisdiction as the result of an accident involving a motor vehicle and the circumstances of such accident. Such report by the coroner shall be made within ten days after such death.

Laws 1974, LB 66, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,104.06;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 197;

Laws 1993, LB 590, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 187.

Where in course of autopsy, and not for purpose of complying with statute in effect at time of accident, coroner compiled information as to alcohol content of blood, his testimony was not inadmissible in wrongful death case. Blackledge v. Martin K. Eby Constr. Co., Inc. 542 F.2d 474 (8th Cir. 1976).